apertium-eo-en.en.dix
<pardef n="le/ad__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>ading</l>               <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>aded</l>                <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>d</l>                   <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>aded</l>                <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>d</l>                   <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ad</l>                  <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ads</l>                 <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="counterbid__n">
<e>                           <p><l>s</l>                   <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>s</l>                   <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="predict\/advocate__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>d</l>                   <r>advocate<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r>advocate<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="w/eave__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>eaving</l>              <r>eave<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>eaved</l>               <r>eave<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ove</l>                 <r>eave<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>eaved</l>               <r>eave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>oven</l>                <r>eave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>eave</l>                <r>eave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>eaves</l>               <r>eave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="overbid__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>ding</l>                <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>den</l>                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>s</l>                   <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="pl/y__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>ying</l>                <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ied</l>                 <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ied</l>                 <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>y</l>                   <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ies</l>                 <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="t/ear__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>earing</l>              <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ore</l>                 <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>orn</l>                 <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ear</l>                 <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ears</l>                <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="fib/re__n">
<e>                           <p><l>ers</l>                 <r>re<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>er</l>                  <r>re<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="labo/urer__n">
<e>                           <p><l>rers</l>                <r>urer<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>rer</l>                 <r>urer<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="wen/d__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>ded</l>                 <r>d<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ding</l>                <r>d<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>t</l>                   <r>d<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ded</l>                 <r>d<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>t</l>                   <r>d<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>d</l>                   <r>d<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ds</l>                  <r>d<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ax/e__n">
<e>                           <p><l>es</l>                  <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="practi/sed__adj">
<e>                           <p><l>ced</l>                 <r>sed<s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="hoo/f__n">
<e>                           <p><l>fs</l>                  <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ves</l>                 <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>f</l>                   <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="favo/urite__adj">
<e>                           <p><l>rite</l>                <r>urite<s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="panel/ling__n">
<e>                           <p><l>ings</l>                <r>ling<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ing</l>                 <r>ling<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="s/ceptical__adj">
<e>                           <p><l>keptical</l>            <r>ceptical<s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="d/ig__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>igging</l>              <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ug</l>                  <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ug</l>                  <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ig</l>                  <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>igs</l>                 <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="grip/e__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>ing</l>                 <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ed</l>                  <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>e</l>                   <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>es</l>                  <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="annexe">               <i>annex</i><par n="ax/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="behalf">               <i>behal</i><par n="hoo/f__n"/></e>
<e lm="bully">                <i>bull</i><par n="pl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="codify">               <i>codif</i><par n="pl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="comply">               <i>compl</i><par n="pl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="declassify">           <i>declassif</i><par n="pl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="decry">                <i>decr</i><par n="pl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="diversify">            <i>diversif</i><par n="pl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ferry">                <i>ferr</i><par n="pl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="grief">                <i>grie</i><par n="hoo/f__n"/></e>
<e lm="gripe">                <i>grip</i><par n="grip/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="harry">                <i>harr</i><par n="pl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="hoof">                 <i>hoo</i><par n="hoo/f__n"/></e>
<e lm="labourer">             <i>labo</i><par n="labo/urer__n"/></e>
<e lm="levy">                 <i>lev</i><par n="pl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="magnify">              <i>magnif</i><par n="pl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="mischief">             <i>mischie</i><par n="hoo/f__n"/></e>
<e lm="mollify">              <i>mollif</i><par n="pl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ply">                  <i>pl</i><par n="pl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="preoccupy">            <i>preoccup</i><par n="pl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="query">                <i>quer</i><par n="pl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rally">                <i>rall</i><par n="pl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ready">                <i>read</i><par n="pl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rectify">              <i>rectif</i><par n="pl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sceptical">            <i>s</i><par n="s/ceptical__adj"/></e>
<e lm="scurry">               <i>scurr</i><par n="pl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="spectre">              <i>spect</i><par n="fib/re__n"/></e>
<e lm="spy">                  <i>sp</i><par n="pl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="steady">               <i>stead</i><par n="pl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tally">                <i>tall</i><par n="pl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dig">                  <i>d</i><par n="d/ig__vblex"/></e>
